District of Columbia statutes.
31-5203

Copy of application by insured to be delivered with policy.

Each life insurance company, benefit order, and association doing a life insurance business in the District of Columbia shall deliver with each policy issued by it a copy of the application made by the insured so that the whole contract may appear in said application and policy, in default of which no defense shall be allowed to such policy on account of anything contained in, or omitted from, such application.

History

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1294, ch. 854, § 657
June 30, 1902, 32 Stat. 534, ch. 1329

Cross References

Hospital and medical services corporations, applicability of this section, see § 31-3503.
Industrial life insurance policies, proof of fraud etc., with reference to requirements of this section, see § 31-4802.

Section References

This section is referenced in § 31-3503 and § 31-4802.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 35-203.
1973 Ed., § 35-203.